California statutes. Education Code
(ii) A college-level, occupational course for credit assigned a priority code of “A,” “B,” or “C,” pursuant to the Student Accountability Model, as defined by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and reported in the management information system, and the course is part of a sequence of vocational or career technical education courses leading to a degree or certificate in the subject area covered by the
 sequence.

(B) The 5-percent limitation of pupils allowed to be recommended pursuant to paragraph (2) shall apply to all physical education courses.

(5) On or before March 1 of each year, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall report to the Department of Finance the number of pupils recommended pursuant to paragraphs (3) and (4) who enroll in community college summer session courses and who receive a passing grade. The information in this report may be submitted with the report required by subdivision (c) of Section 76002.

(6) The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall not include enrollment growth attributable to paragraphs (3) and (4) as part of its annual budget request for the California Community Colleges.

(7) Notwithstanding Article 3 (commencing with Section 33050) of Chapter 1 of Part 20 of Division 2, compliance with this subdivision shall not be waived.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 74, Sec. 1.   (SB 619)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

48800.5.

(a) A parent or guardian of a pupil, regardless of the pupil’s age or class level, may petition the governing board of the school district in which the pupil is enrolled to authorize the attendance of the pupil at a community college as a special full-time student on the ground that the pupil would benefit from advanced scholastic or vocational work that would thereby be available. If the governing board denies the petition, the pupil’s parent or guardian may file an appeal with the county board of education, which shall render a final decision on the petition in writing within 30 days.

(b) A pupil who attends a community college as a special full-time student pursuant to this section is exempt from compulsory school attendance under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 46100) of Part 26.

(c) A parent or guardian of a pupil who is not enrolled in a public school may directly petition the president of any community college to authorize the attendance of the pupil at the community college as a special part-time or full-time student on the ground that the pupil would benefit from advanced scholastic or vocational work that would thereby be available.

(d) Any pupil authorized to attend a community college as a special full-time student shall, nevertheless, be required to undertake courses of instruction of a scope and duration sufficient to satisfy the requirements of law.

(e) For purposes of allowances and apportionments from the State School Fund, a community college shall be credited with additional units of average daily attendance attributable to the attendance of special full-time students at the community college.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 786, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

48801.

Any student authorized to attend a community college as a special part-time student pursuant to Sections 48800 and 76001 shall, nevertheless, be required to undertake courses of instruction of a scope and duration sufficient to satisfy the requirements of law.

The student shall also be required to attend school for the minimum schoolday, except as provided for in Section 46145 or 46147. However, the governing board of the school district may permit the student to attend school for such a lesser period of time than the minimum schoolday as the board shall find to be in the student’s best interests.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 513, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

48802.

(a) For purposes of allowances and apportionments from Section B of the State School Fund, a community college shall be credited with additional units of average daily attendance attributable to the attendance of pupils at the community college as special part-time students pursuant to this article and as set forth in Section 76002.

(b) A school district whose pupils attend a community college as special part-time students pursuant to this article shall, for purposes of allowances and apportionments from Section A of the State School Fund, continue to receive credit for attendance by those pupils computed in the manner prescribed by law, and a pupil’s attendance at school for the minimum schoolday shall be deemed a day of attendance for purposes of making the computation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 786, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. College Promise Partnership Act [48810. - 48813.]

48810.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the College Promise Partnership Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 633, Sec. 2.   (SB 650)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

48810.5.

The Long Beach Community College District and the Long Beach Unified School District may enter into a partnership to provide participating pupils with an aligned sequence of rigorous high school and college coursework leading to capstone college courses, with consistent and jointly established eligibility for college courses. As used in this article, “capstone college course” means a community college course described in subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 48800.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 633, Sec. 2.   (SB 650)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

48811.

(a) The purpose of the partnership authorized by Section 48810.5 shall be to provide a seamless bridge to college for pupils not already college bound and to reduce the time needed for advanced students to complete programs.

(b) A pupil who elects to participate in the partnership authorized by Section 48810.5 shall complete the grade 11 achievement test provided for in Section 60640, or a successor test approved by the state board, to determine readiness for college-level coursework, and shall enroll in coursework during grade 12 to remedy any deficiencies diagnosed by the achievement test. The consent of a parent or guardian of a pupil shall be required prior to a pupil’s participation
 in the partnership.

(c) Article 1 (commencing with Section 48800) does not apply to pupils enrolled in a partnership operating pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 762, Sec. 1.   (AB 1533)   Effective October 13, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

48812.

(a) The Long Beach Community College District and the Long Beach Unified School District shall design the partnership to include focused curricular pathways leading to credit in at least one of the following: general education, a career technical certificate, or a degree, including at least one capstone college course.

(b) The partnership shall coordinate the delivery of student support services, including counseling, to participating pupils.

(c) The Long Beach Community College District shall not be eligible to enter into the partnership unless it participates in the Early Assessment Program (EAP) as described in Section
 99301.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 633, Sec. 2.   (SB 650)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

48813.

(a) For purposes of allowances and apportionments from Section B of the State School Fund, the Long Beach Community College District shall be credited with additional units of full-time equivalent students (FTES) attributable to the attendance of partnership pupils at the Long Beach City College.

(b) Pupils of the Long Beach Unified School District who attend Long Beach City College pursuant to this article shall, for purposes of allowances and apportionments from Section A of the State School Fund, continue to receive credit for attendance by those pupils computed in the manner prescribed by law, and a pupil’s attendance at school for the minimum schoolday shall be deemed a day of attendance for
 purposes of making the computation.

(c) The Long Beach Community College District shall not receive an allowance or an apportionment for an instructional activity for which the Long Beach Unified School District has been, or shall be, paid an allowance or an apportionment.

(d) The Long Beach Community College District shall implement this article and Sections 76001.5, 76002.1, 76003, and 76004 in a manner that does not result in increased allocations, which are above the regularly funded FTES enrollment cap, from the General Fund for the Long Beach Community College District.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 633, Sec. 2.   (SB 650)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.5. Education of Pupils in Foster Care and Pupils Who Are Homeless [48850. - 48859.]

48850.

(a) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that all pupils in foster care and those who are homeless, as defined by the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11301 et seq.), have a meaningful opportunity to meet the challenging state pupil academic achievement standards to which all pupils are held. In fulfilling their responsibilities to these pupils, educators, county placing agencies, care providers, advocates, and the juvenile courts shall work together to maintain stable school placements and to ensure that each pupil is placed in the least restrictive educational programs, and has access to the academic resources, services, and extracurricular and enrichment activities that are available
 to all pupils, including, but not necessarily limited to, interscholastic sports administered by the California Interscholastic Federation. In all instances, educational and school placement decisions shall be based on the best interests of the child and shall consider, among other factors, educational stability and the opportunity to be educated in the least restrictive educational setting necessary to achieve academic progress.

(2) A foster child who changes residences pursuant to a court order or decision of a child welfare worker or a homeless child or youth shall be immediately deemed to meet all residency requirements for participation in interscholastic sports or other extracurricular activities.

(3) (A) Pursuant to the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance
 Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11301 et seq.), public schools, including charter schools, and county offices of education shall immediately enroll a homeless child or youth seeking enrollment except where the enrollment would be in conflict with subdivision (e) of Section 47605.

(B) The department and the State Department of Social Services shall identify representatives from the department, the State Department of Social Services, and other state agencies that have experience in homeless youth issues to develop policies and practices to support homeless children and youths and to ensure that child abuse and neglect reporting requirements do not create barriers to the school enrollment and attendance of homeless children or youths, including, but not limited to, ensuring that a pupil who is a homeless child or youth is not reported to law enforcement
 by school personnel if the sole reason for the report is the pupil’s homelessness. The selected representatives shall present the policies and practices to the Superintendent and the State Department of Social Services to be considered for implementation or dissemination, as appropriate.

(C) (i) If a local educational agency operates an intersession program, the local educational agency shall grant priority access to a homeless child or youth.

(ii) Notwithstanding any other law, if the homeless youth will be moving during an intersession period, the pupil’s parent, guardian, educational rights holder, or Indian custodian in the case of an Indian child, or, if there is no parent, guardian, educational rights holder, or Indian custodian, the unaccompanied homeless
 youth, shall determine which school the pupil attends for the intersession period, if applicable.

(b) Every county office of education shall make available to agencies that place children in licensed children’s institutions information on educational options for children residing in licensed children’s institutions within the jurisdiction of the county office of education for use by the placing agencies in assisting parents and foster children to choose educational placements.

(c) For purposes of individuals with exceptional needs residing in licensed children’s institutions, making a copy of the annual service plan, prepared pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 56205, available to those special education local plan areas that have revised their local plans pursuant to Section
 56836.03 shall meet the requirements of subdivision (b).

(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Homeless child or youth” and “homeless children and youths” as they are defined in Section 11434a(2) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(2) “Indian custodian” as it is defined in Section 1903 of Title 25 of the United States Code.

(3) (A) “Intersession program” means an expanded learning program offered by a local educational agency on nonschooldays, including, but not limited to, summer school.

(B) An intersession program does not include
 an extended school year program for individuals with exceptional needs established pursuant to Section 3043 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations and Section 300.106 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal
 Regulations.

(4) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(5) “Pupils in foster care” has the same meaning as “foster child,” as that term is defined in subdivision (a) of Section 48853.5.

(6) “Unaccompanied homeless youth” has the same meaning as “unaccompanied youth” in Section 11434a(2) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 327, Sec. 1.   (AB 373)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

48851.

(a) As required pursuant to Section 11432(g)(6)(A)(i) of Title 42 of the United States Code, a local educational agency shall ensure that each school within the local educational agency identifies all homeless children and youths and unaccompanied youths enrolled at the school.

(b) (1) A local educational agency shall administer a housing questionnaire for purposes of identifying homeless children and youths and unaccompanied youths, as those terms are defined in Section 11434a(2) of Title 42 of the United States Code, in accordance with the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11303 et seq.). By the end of the 2021–22 school year, a local educational
 agency shall ensure that the housing questionnaire is based on best practices developed by the department pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 48852.5. The housing questionnaire shall include an explanation of the rights and protections a pupil has as a homeless child or youth or as an unaccompanied youth. The housing questionnaire shall be available in paper form.

(2) A local educational agency shall annually provide the housing questionnaire described in paragraph (1) to all parents or guardians of pupils and to all unaccompanied youths of the local educational agency.

(3) If the primary language of a pupil’s parent or guardian or an unaccompanied youth
 is not English, either of the following shall occur:

(A) The housing questionnaire shall be made available in the primary language of the unaccompanied youth or the pupil’s parent or guardian pursuant to Section 48985.

(B) An appropriate translation of the housing questionnaire shall be provided upon request of a pupil’s parent or guardian or an unaccompanied youth.

(4) A local educational agency shall collect the completed housing questionnaires that it administered pursuant to this section, and shall annually report to the department the number of homeless children and youths and unaccompanied youths enrolled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 912, Sec. 1.   (AB 2375)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

48851.3.

(a) As used in this section, “liaison” means a local educational agency liaison for homeless children and youths and unaccompanied youths designated pursuant to Section 11432(g)(1)(J)(ii) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(b) A local educational agency shall establish homeless education program policies that are consistent with the provisions of this chapter and use resources developed by the department and posted on the department’s internet website pursuant to Section 48852.5 and resources developed by homeless education
 technical assistance centers established using funding from the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (Public Law 117-2). The local educational agency shall update these policies at intervals that shall not exceed three years.

(c) A liaison shall do both of the following:

 (1) (A) Offer training to local educational agency certificated and classified employees providing services to pupils experiencing homelessness, pursuant to Section 11432(g)(6)(A)(ix) of Title 42 of the United States Code, including, but not limited to, teachers, support staff, and other school staff who work with pupils, at least annually relating to both of the following:

(i) The homeless education program policies established under subdivision (b).

(ii) Recognition of signs that pupils are experiencing, or are at risk of experiencing, homelessness.

(B) A liaison is encouraged to offer the training described in subparagraph (A) to all local educational agency certificated and classified employees, including, but not limited to, teachers, support staff, and other school staff who work with pupils.

(2) Inform the employees described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (1) of the availability of training and the services the liaison provides to aid in the identification and provision of services to pupils who are experiencing, or are at risk of experiencing, homelessness.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 904, Sec. 1.   (AB 408)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

48851.5.

Pursuant to Section 11432(g)(6) of Title 42 of the United States Code, a local educational agency liaison for homeless children and youths shall ensure that homeless children and youths are identified by school personnel through outreach and coordination activities with other entities and agencies and that homeless families and homeless children and youths receive referrals to health care services, dental services, mental health and substance abuse services, housing services, and other appropriate services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 400, Sec. 1.   (SB 400)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

48852.

Every agency that places a child in a licensed children’s institution shall notify the local educational agency at the time a pupil is placed in a licensed children’s institution. As part of that notification, the placing agency shall provide any available information on immediate past educational placements to facilitate prompt transfer of records and appropriate educational placement. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit prompt educational placement prior to notification.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 311, Sec. 1.   Effective August 19, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

48852.3.

The department, to the extent possible within existing resources, shall develop and implement a plan for monitoring the compliance of local educational agencies with this chapter. The implementation of this risk-based monitoring plan shall include reviews of the local educational agencies that shall include, but not be limited to, schoolsite inspections to ensure that the state is not underestimating the number of youth experiencing homelessness.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 904, Sec. 2.   (AB 408)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

48852.5.

(a) Pursuant to the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11301 et seq.), a local educational agency liaison for homeless children and youths and unaccompanied youths designated pursuant to Section 11432(g)(1)(J)(ii) of Title 42 of the United States Code, shall ensure that public notice of the educational rights of homeless children and youths and unaccompanied youths is disseminated in schools within the liaison’s local educational agency that provide services pursuant to the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11301 et seq.).

(b) The department shall provide informational materials to local educational agency liaisons for homeless children and youths and unaccompanied youths regarding the educational rights of
 homeless children and youths and unaccompanied youths under state and federal law, updates and changes to state and federal law regarding the rights of homeless students, the responsibilities of local educational agency liaisons relating to homeless children and youths and unaccompanied youths, and the resources available to schools to assist homeless children and youths and unaccompanied youths.

(c) (1) The department shall provide training materials to local educational agency liaisons for homeless children and youths and unaccompanied youths to assist liaisons with providing professional development and other support to school personnel providing services pursuant to the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act. These materials are intended to support liaisons in meeting the requirements of the federal Every Student Succeeds Act, as specified in Section 11432(g)(6)(A)(ix) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(2) The department shall develop and implement a system to verify that local educational agencies are providing the required training to school personnel providing services to youth experiencing homelessness at least annually.

(d) The department may use and adapt informational and training materials from state or national sources when applicable and appropriate.

(e) The department shall adopt policies and practices to ensure that local educational agency liaisons for homeless children and youths participate in professional development and other technical assistance programs that are deemed appropriate by the Superintendent in accordance with the federal Every Student Succeeds Act, as specified in Section 11432(g)(1)(J)(iv) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(f) (1) The department shall develop and implement procedures for verifying key information submitted by local educational agencies to comply with the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Education Assistance Improvements Act of 2001 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11431 et seq.).

(2) The department shall review the information submitted by local educational agencies to comply with the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Education Assistance Improvements Act of 2001 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11431 et seq.), and remind each local educational agency for which information about its policies is outdated to update their policies to reflect current requirements.

(g) (1) The department shall develop both of the following:

(A) Best practices that a local educational agency may use to identify and obtain
 accurate data on all homeless children and youths and unaccompanied youths enrolled in schools of the local educational agency. The department shall develop these best practices in accordance with the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11301 et seq.) and in a manner informed by relevant guidance from experts on the identification of homeless children and youths and unaccompanied youths, including, but not limited to, the United States Department of Education and technical assistance centers sponsored by the Office of Safe and Healthy Students of the United States Department of Education. These best practices may include the distribution of information relating to the educational rights and resources of persons experiencing homelessness in public places that are frequently visited by homeless children and youths and unaccompanied youths.

(B) A model housing questionnaire, based on best practices developed pursuant to
 subparagraph (A), that a local educational agency may use to identify and obtain accurate data on all homeless children and youths and unaccompanied youths enrolled at schools of the local educational agency.

(2) The department shall post the best practices and model housing questionnaire developed pursuant to paragraph (1) on its internet website.

(h) Data collected by the department or by a local educational agency pursuant to this chapter shall be used in accordance with all state and federal laws regarding student privacy and the collection and use of student data.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 400, Sec. 2.5.   (SB 400)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

48852.6.

(a) For purposes of this section, “liaison” means a local educational agency liaison for homeless children and youths and unaccompanied youths designated pursuant to Section 11432(g)(1)(J)(ii) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(b) A school district, charter school, or county office of education shall create an internet web page or post on its internet website both of the following:

(1) A list of the liaisons in that school district, charter school, or county office of education, respectively, and the contact information for those liaisons.

(2) Specific information on homelessness, including, but not limited to, information regarding the educational rights and resources available to persons experiencing homelessness.

(c) If available, a school shall post on its internet website, if the school has an internet website, the contact information for the liaison. In addition, if a school has an employee or person under contract whose duties include assisting the liaison in completing the liaison’s duties under Section 11432(g)(6) of Title 42 of the United States Code, the school shall post on its internet website, if the school has an internet website, the name and contact information for that employee or person under contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 394, Sec. 4.   (AB 27)   Effective September 29, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

48852.7.

(a) At the point of any change or any subsequent change in residence once a child becomes a homeless child, the local educational agency serving the homeless child shall allow the homeless child to continue his or her education in the school of origin through the duration of homelessness.

(b) If the homeless child’s status changes before the end of the academic year so that he or she is no longer homeless, either of the following apply:

(1) If the homeless child is in high school, the local educational agency shall allow the formerly homeless child to continue his or her education in the school of origin through graduation.

(2) If the homeless child is in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 8, inclusive, the local educational agency shall allow the formerly homeless child to continue his or her education in the school of origin through the duration of the academic school year.

(c) To ensure that the homeless child has the benefit of matriculating with his or her peers in accordance with the established feeder patterns of school districts, the following apply:

(1) If the homeless child is transitioning between school grade levels, the local educational agency shall allow the homeless child to continue in the school district of origin in the same attendance area.

(2) If the homeless child is transitioning to a middle school or high school, and the school designated for
 matriculation is in another school district, the local educational agency shall allow the homeless child to continue to the school designated for matriculation in that school district.

(3) The new school shall immediately enroll the homeless child even if the child has outstanding fees, fines, textbooks, or other items or moneys due to the school last attended or is unable to produce clothing or records normally required for enrollment, such as previous academic records, medical records, including, but not limited to, records or other proof of immunization history pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 120325) of Part 2 of Division 105 of the Health and Safety Code, proof of residency, other documentation, or school uniforms.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that this section shall not supersede or exceed other laws governing special education services for eligible
 homeless children.

(e) (1) The federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11301 et seq.) shall govern the procedures for transportation and dispute resolution with respect to homeless children and school of origin.

(2) This section does not require a school district to provide transportation to a former homeless child who has an individualized education program that does not require transportation as a related service and who changes residence but remains in his or her school of origin pursuant to this section, unless the individualized education program team determines that transportation is a necessary related service, or the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act requires transportation to be provided.

(3) This section does not require a school district to provide
 transportation services to allow a homeless child to attend a school or school district, unless otherwise required under the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act or other federal law. A school district may, at its discretion, provide transportation services to allow a homeless child to attend a school or school district.

(f) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Homeless child” has the same meaning as in Section 11434a(2) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(2) “School of origin” means the school that the homeless child attended when permanently housed or the school in which the homeless child was last enrolled. If the school the homeless child attended when permanently housed is different from the school in which the homeless child was last enrolled, or if there is some
 other school that the homeless child attended with which the homeless child is connected and that the homeless child attended within the immediately preceding 15 months, the educational liaison, in consultation with, and with the agreement of, the homeless child and the person holding the right to make educational decisions for the homeless child, shall determine, in the best interests of the homeless child, the school that shall be deemed the school of origin.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 289, Sec. 1.   (SB 445)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

48853.

(a) A pupil described in subdivision (a) of Section 48853.5 who is placed in a licensed children’s institution or foster family home as defined in Section 56155.5, shall attend programs operated by the local educational agency, unless one of the following applies:

(1) The pupil is entitled to remain in his or her school of origin pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 48853.5.

(2) The pupil has an individualized education program requiring placement in a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency, or in another local educational agency.

(3) The parent or guardian, or other person
 holding the right to make educational decisions for the pupil pursuant to Section 361 or 726 of the Welfare and Institutions Code or Section 56055, determines that it is in the best interests of the pupil to be placed in another educational program, in which case the parent or guardian or other person holding the right to make educational decisions for the pupil shall provide a written statement that he or she has made that determination to the local educational agency. This statement shall include a declaration that the parent, guardian, or other person holding the right to make educational decisions for the pupil is aware of all of the following:

(A) The pupil has a right to attend a regular public school in the least restrictive environment.

(B) The alternate education program is a special education program, if applicable.

(C) The decision to unilaterally remove the pupil from the regular public school and to place the pupil in an alternate education program may not be financed by the local educational agency.

(D) Any attempt to seek reimbursement for the alternate education program may be at the expense of the parent, guardian, or other person holding the right to make educational decisions for the pupil.

(b) For purposes of ensuring a parent, guardian, or other person holding the right to make educational decisions for the pupil is aware of the information described in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), the local educational agency may provide him or her with that information in writing.

(c) Before any decision is made to place a pupil in a juvenile court school as defined by
 Section 48645.1, a community school as described in Sections 1981 and 48660, or other alternative educational setting, the parent or guardian, or person holding the right to make educational decisions for the pupil pursuant to Section 361 or 726 of the Welfare and Institutions Code or Section 56055, shall first consider placement in the regular public school.

(d) If any dispute arises as to the school placement of a pupil subject to this section, the pupil has the right to remain in his or her school of origin, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 48853.5, pending resolution of the dispute. The dispute shall be resolved in accordance with the existing dispute resolution process available to any pupil served by the local educational agency.

(e) This section does not supersede other laws that govern pupil expulsion.

(f) This section does not supersede any other law governing the educational placement in a juvenile court school, as defined by Section 48645.1, of a pupil detained in a county juvenile hall, or committed to a county juvenile ranch, camp, forestry camp, or regional facility.

(g) (1) Foster children living in emergency shelters, as referenced in the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11301 et seq.), may receive educational services at the emergency shelter as necessary for short periods of time for either of the following reasons:

(A) For health and safety emergencies.

(B) To provide temporary, special, and supplementary services to meet the child’s unique needs if a decision regarding whether it is in the child’s best interests to attend the school of
 origin cannot be made promptly, it is not practical to transport the child to the school of origin, and the child would otherwise not receive educational services.

(2) The educational services may be provided at the shelter pending a determination by the person holding the right regarding the educational placement of the child.

(h) All educational and school placement decisions shall be made to ensure that the child is placed in the least restrictive educational programs and has access to academic resources, services, and extracurricular and enrichment activities that are available to all pupils. In all instances, educational and school placement decisions shall be based on the best interests of the child.

(i) (1) A complaint of noncompliance with the requirements of this section may be filed
 with the local educational agency under the Uniform Complaint Procedures set forth in Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) A complainant not satisfied with the decision of a local educational agency may appeal the decision to the department pursuant to Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations and shall receive a written decision regarding the appeal within 60 days of the department’s receipt of the appeal.

(3) If a local educational agency finds merit in a complaint, or the Superintendent finds merit in an appeal, the local educational agency shall provide a remedy to the affected pupil.

(4) Information regarding the requirements of this section shall be included in the annual
 notification distributed to, among others, pupils, parents or guardians of pupils, employees, and other interested parties pursuant to Section 4622 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 612, Sec. 3.   (AB 1997)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

48853.5.

(a) This section applies to a foster child. “Foster child” means any of the following:

(1) A child who has been removed from their home pursuant to Section 309 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) A child who is the subject of a petition filed under Section 300 or 602 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, whether or not the child has been removed from their home.

(3) A dependent child of the court of an Indian tribe, consortium of tribes, or tribal organization who is the subject of a petition filed in the tribal court pursuant to the tribal court’s jurisdiction in accordance with the tribe’s law.

(4) A child who is the subject of a voluntary placement agreement, as defined in subdivision (p) of Section 11400 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) The department, in consultation with the California Foster Youth Education Task Force, shall develop a standardized notice of the educational rights of foster children, as specified in Sections 48850 to this section, inclusive, and Sections 48911, 48915.5, 49069.5, 49076, 51225.1, and 51225.2. The notice shall include complaint process information, as applicable. The department shall make the notice available to educational liaisons for foster children for dissemination by posting the notice on its internet website. Any version of this notice prepared for use by foster children shall also include, to the greatest extent practicable, the rights established pursuant to Section 16001.9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. In
 developing the notice that includes the rights in Section 16001.9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the department shall consult with the Office of the State Foster Care Ombudsperson.

(c) Each local educational agency shall designate a staff person as the educational liaison for foster children. In a school district that operates a foster children services program pursuant to Chapter 11.3 (commencing with Section 42920) of Part 24 of Division 3, the educational liaison shall be affiliated with the local foster children services program. The educational liaison shall do both of the following:

(1) Ensure and facilitate the proper educational placement, enrollment in school, and checkout from school of foster children.

(2) Assist foster children when transferring from one school to another school or from one school
 district to another school district in ensuring proper transfer of credits, records, and grades.
